Utah statutes.
62A-15-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Director" means the director of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.

(2)  "Division" means the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health established in Section 62A-15-103.

(3)  "Local mental health authority" means a county legislative body.

(4)  "Local substance abuse authority" means a county legislative body.

(5) (a)  "Public funds" means federal money received from the Department of Human Services or the Department of Health, and state money appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Human Services, the Department of Health, a county governing body, or a local substance abuse authority, or a local mental health authority for the purposes of providing substance abuse or mental health programs or services.

(b)  "Public funds" include federal and state money that has been transferred by a local substance abuse authority or a local mental health authority to a private provider under an annual or otherwise ongoing contract to provide comprehensive substance abuse or mental health programs or services for the local substance abuse authority or local mental health authority.  The money maintains the nature of "public funds" while in the possession of the private entity that has an annual or otherwise ongoing contract with a local substance abuse authority or a local mental health authority to provide comprehensive substance abuse or mental health programs or services for the local substance abuse authority or local mental health authority.

(c)  Public funds received for the provision of services pursuant to substance abuse or mental health service plans may not be used for any other purpose except those authorized in the contract between the local mental health or substance abuse authority and provider for the provision of plan services.

(6)  "Severe mental disorder" means schizophrenia, major depression, bipolar disorders, delusional disorders, psychotic disorders, and other mental disorders as defined by the division.



Amended by Chapter 342, 2011 General Session

